Maryland, session 2025, SB0762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–112.
(A) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A record
relating to an administrative or criminal investigation of misconduct by a police officer,
including an internal affairs investigatory record, a hearing record, and records relating to
a disciplinary decision, may not be:
(1) expunged; or
(2) destroyed by a law enforcement agency.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0762*

SENATE BILL 762
(B) FOR A MATTER REVIEWED BY AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING
COMMITTEE, A RECORD RELATING TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE INVESTIGATION OF
MISCONDUCT BY A POLICE OFFICER, INCLUDING THE COMPLAINT OF MISCONDUCT,
SHALL BE EXPUNGED 3 YEARS AFTER THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE
DETERMINES THAT THE POLICE OFFICER WILL NOT BE ADMINISTRATIVELY
CHARGED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.